test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_II_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - g̲íihlgii - ENGLISH : # CLASS_II_STEM_2

     g̲íihlgii+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: g̲íihlgaayaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+INDIRECT+PAST: g̲íihlgaayaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: g̲íihlgaayaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: g̲íihlgaayaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: g̲íihlgaay'ahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+CERTAIN+PAST: g̲íihlgaay'ahlanggan
     g̲íihlgii+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: g̲íihlgaay'ahlanggiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: g̲íihlgaay'ahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: g̲íihlgaayaa'ahlang
     g̲íihlgii+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: g̲íihlgaayaa'ahlanggaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: g̲íihlgaayaa'ahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+REFLEXIVE: g̲íihlgaay'ahl
